Utah statutes.
31A-33-105.   Price of insurance -- Liability of state.

(1)  The Workers' Compensation Fund shall provide workers' compensation insurance at an actuarially sound price, which the board shall determine.

(2)  The state:

(a)  is not liable for the expenses, liabilities, or debts of:

(i)  the Workers' Compensation Fund;

(ii)  a subsidiary of the fund; or

(iii)  a joint enterprise in which the fund participates; and

(b)  may not use any assets of the Injury Fund for any purpose.

